Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1503
Forgery; instruments; how described.

In any indictment for falsely making, altering, forging, printing, photographing, uttering, disposing of or putting off any instrument, it shall be sufficient to set forth the purport and value thereof.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 414, p. 817;

R.S.1913, § 9052;

C.S.1922, § 10076;

C.S.1929, § 29-1503;

R.S.1943, § 29-1503.

Variance between information charging forgery and note alleged to be forged was not fatal. Flannigan v. State, 127 Neb. 640, 256 N.W. 321 (1934).

Where information charged forgery of checks, it was proper, but not necessary, to set forth a copy of the endorsements on the back of the checks. Cooper v. State, 123 Neb. 605, 243 N.W. 837 (1932).

On information for forgery, variance not prejudicial to rights of defendant was immaterial. Burlingim v. State, 61 Neb. 276, 85 N.W. 76 (1901).

Forgery and fraudulent uttering of one instrument by same person is but one crime. Griffen v. State, 46 Neb. 282, 64 N.W. 966 (1895); In re Walsh, 37 Neb. 454, 55 N.W. 1075 (1893).